Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7142.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 40.1 of the General Laws entitled "BEHAVIORAL HEALTHCARE,
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES AND HOSPITALS" is hereby amended by adding thereto
the following chapter:
CHAPTER 8.6
CERTIFIED COMMUNITY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CLINICS ACCOUNTABILITY AND
OVERSIGHT ACT
40.1-8.6-1. Short title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Certified Community Behavioral Health
Clinics Accountability and Oversight Act."
40.1-8.6-2. Purpose.
The purpose of this chapter is to ensure transparency, fiscal responsibility, and service
quality by certified community behavioral health clinics (CCBHCs) operating in Rhode Island. It
establishes standards for oversight and requires regular reporting on established federal and state
performance metrics, including those utilized by the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services
Administration (SAMHSA).
40.1-8.6-3. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "CCBHC" means a certified community behavioral health clinic as defined pursuant to

§ 40.1-8.5-8 as recognized by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities
and hospitals (BHDDH) and/or funded through the U.S. Department of Health and Human
Services.
(2) "EOHHS" means the Rhode Island executive office of health and human services.
(3) "Joint oversight committee on CCBHCs" or “joint oversight committee” means the
legislative body established under this chapter.
40.1-8.6-4. Transparency and reporting requirements.
(a) Financial disclosures. CCBHCs shall submit annual, audited financial reports to
EOHHS and the joint oversight committee including, but not limited to:
(1) Total revenue and expenditures;
(2) Executive compensation;
(3) Administrative overhead; and
(4) Programmatic spending.
(b) Performance Metrics. Each CCBHC shall report annually on the following metrics:
(1) Metrics established by SAMHSA for CCBHCs including, but not limited to:
(i) Access to care to include wait times for services;
(ii) Engagement in care to include follow-up after hospitalization;
(iii) Service penetration rates for high-need populations;
(iv) Outcomes on mental health and substance use treatment goals; and
(v) Mobile response and stabilization services (MRSS) utilization and outcomes.
(2) State-determined metrics, which may include:
(i) Patient satisfaction scores;
(ii) Emergency department diversion outcomes;
(iii) Staff-to-client ratios; and
(iv) Coordination with schools, primary care, and other local systems.
(c) Data submission. All required reports shall be:
(1) Filed with EOHHS by December 31 of each year; and
(2) Made publicly available on the EOHHS website within thirty (30) days of submission.
40.1-8.6-5. Joint oversight committee on CCBHCs.
(a) Establishment. There is hereby created a joint oversight committee of the general
assembly on CCBHC Oversight.
(b) Membership.
(1) The joint oversight committee shall consist of eight (8) members:
(i) Four (4) members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house
LC003885 - Page 2 of 4

no more than three (3) of whom shall be from the same political party; and
(ii) Four (4) members of the senate appointed by the senate president, no more than three
(3) of whom shall be from the same political party;
(2) Appointments shall reflect bipartisan representation and include members from
committees related to health, finance, and oversight.
(c) Powers and duties. The joint oversight committee shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) Review annual CCBHC financial and performance reports;
(2) Hold public hearings and receive testimony from relevant stakeholders;
(3) Evaluate the impact of CCBHCs on state behavioral health policy; and
(4) Recommend legislative or regulatory changes as needed.
40.1-8.6-6. Annual report by EOHHS.
The secretary of the EOHHS shall:
(1) Submit a written report to the speaker of the house, the senate president, and the joint
oversight committee by January 31 of each year
(2) This report shall summarize:
(i) Statewide performance of all certified CCBHCs;
(ii) Compliance with financial and performance reporting standards; and
(iii) Recommendations for quality improvement, funding models, and regulation.
40.1-8.6-7. Implementation -- Rules and regulations.
EOHHS shall:
(1) Promulgate rules and regulations to implement and enforce the reporting requirements
of this chapter; and
(2) Establish a standardized format and platform for annual CCBHC reporting.
40.1-8.6-8. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, the invalidity does not
affect other provisions or applications of this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003885
========
LC003885 - Page 3 of 4